Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Article 12. Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative.

§ 51.5-178.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Advisory Board”
means the Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Advisory Board established pursuant to §

51.5-180

.

“Fund”
means the Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Trust Fund established pursuant to §

51.5-179

.

“Neurotrauma”
means an injury to the central nervous system, that is, a traumatic spinal cord or brain injury which results in loss of physical and cognitive functions.

History.

2002, c. 60, §

51.5-12.1

; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

§ 51.5-179.
Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Trust Fund established.

For the purpose of preventing traumatic spinal cord or brain injuries and improving the treatment and care of Virginians with traumatic spinal cord or brain injuries, there is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Trust Fund, hereinafter referred to as the “Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller as a revolving fund and shall be administered by the Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Advisory Board in cooperation with the Commissioner. The Fund shall consist of grants, donations, and bequests from public and private sources and funds collected as provided in §

46.2-411

. Such moneys shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the Fund and shall be used for the purposes of this article.

Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. The Fund shall be administered by the Commissioner and distributed according to the grant procedures established pursuant to §

51.5-181

. Moneys in the Fund shall be used to support grants for Virginia-based organizations, institutions, and researchers as follows: (i) 47.5 percent shall be allocated for research on the mechanisms and treatment of neurotrauma, (ii) 47.5 percent shall be allocated for rehabilitative services, and (iii) five percent shall be allocated for the Department’s costs for administering and staffing the Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Advisory Board.

History.

2002, c. 60, § 51.5-12.2; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

§ 51.5-180.
Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Advisory Board established; membership; terms; duties and responsibilities.

For the purpose of administering the Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Trust Fund, in cooperation with the Commissioner, there is hereby established the Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Advisory Board, hereinafter referred to as the Advisory Board. The Department shall provide organizational staff support for the Advisory Board.The Advisory Board shall consist of seven members as follows: one person licensed to practice medicine in Virginia experienced with brain or spinal cord injury; one person licensed by a health regulatory board within the Department of Health Professions with experience in brain or spinal cord injury rehabilitative programs or services; one Virginian with traumatic spinal cord injury or a caretaker thereof; one Virginian with traumatic brain injury or a caretaker thereof; one citizen-at-large who shall not be an elected or appointed public official; the Commissioner; and the State Health Commissioner. The Commissioner and the Commissioner of Health may appoint designees to serve on the Advisory Board. Board members shall be appointed by the Governor. Nominations for appointments may be submitted, at the discretion of the Governor, from relevant organizations.

All members shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of four years. No member shall serve more than two successive terms of four years. The chairman shall be elected from the membership of the Advisory Board for a term of one year and shall be eligible for reelection. The Advisory Board shall meet at the call of the chairman or the Commissioner.

The Advisory Board shall:

Administer, in cooperation with the Commissioner, the Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Trust Fund, in accordance with such regulations as shall be established for the Fund by the Commissioner;

Recommend to the Commissioner the policies and procedures for the administration of the Fund, including criteria for reviewing and ranking grant applications, distribution of funds, and areas of research needed in accordance with the provisions of subsection B of §

51.5-179

;

Review and rank, or arrange for reviewers and technical advisers to review and rank, grant applications for education, basic science and clinical research, and rehabilitative research and community-based rehabilitative services; and

Report triennially on October 1, to the Governor and the General Assembly, aggregate data on the operations and funding of the Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Trust Fund.

The Advisory Board may appoint grant reviewers and other technical advisers to assist it in its duties. Such reviewers and technical advisers shall be appointed in such manner as to provide equal representation from Virginia’s three medical schools. Whenever reviewers or technical advisers sit as a committee, the chairman of the Advisory Board or his designee shall serve as chairman.

History.

2002, c. 60, § 51.5-12.3; 2008, c. 40; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

§ 51.5-181.
Procedures for grant applications.

The Commissioner shall promulgate regulations establishing procedures and policies for soliciting and receiving grant applications and criteria for reviewing and ranking such applications, including, but not limited to, goals, timelines, forms, eligibility, and mechanisms to ensure avoidance of any conflicts of interest or appearances thereof. The Commissioner shall receive the recommendations of the Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Advisory Board prior to promulgating or revising any such regulations.

History.

2002, c. 60, § 51.5-12.4; 2012, cc. 803, 835.